src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verbTVot_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Normal even-syllable -o verbs. GÁDJOT_TV, JÅRGGOT_TV, BÅRSSJOT_IV, VILSSJOT_IV

Tests:
  Verb - goarrot: # GÁDJOT_TV
    goarrot+V+TV+Inf: goarrot 
    goarrot+V+TV+Sup: [goarotjit, gårutjit]
    goarrot+V+TV+Ger: goarodijn
    goarrot+V+TV+PrfPrc: gårrum
    goarrot+V+TV+PrsPrc: goarro
    goarrot+V+TV+Actio+Ess: goarromin
    goarrot+V+TV+Actio+Ela: goarromis
    goarrot+V+TV+VAbess: goarok
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: goarov
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: goaro
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gårru
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gårrun 
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: goarrobihtte
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: goarroba
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gårru
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gårruv
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gårru
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: goaroj
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: goarojma 
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: goarojda
    goarrot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: gårrun
    goarrot+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: goaro
    goarrot+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: goarrop
    goarrot+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: gårrut
    goarrot+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: gårrusa
    goarrot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: gårrut
    goarrot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: gårrusa
    goarrot+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: goarotjip
    goarrot+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: goarotjihpit
    goarrot+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: goarotji
    goarrot+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: goaroduvvat
    goarrot+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: goarolulu
    goarrot+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: goarolulujma

  Verb - májnnot: # JÅRGGOT_TV
    májnnot+V+TV+Inf: májnnot 
    májnnot+V+TV+Sup: [májnotjit, májnutjit]
    májnnot+V+TV+Ger: májnodijn
    májnnot+V+TV+PrfPrc: májnnum
    májnnot+V+TV+PrsPrc: májnno
    májnnot+V+TV+Actio+Ess: májnnomin
    májnnot+V+TV+Actio+Ela: májnnomis
    májnnot+V+TV+VAbess: májnok
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: májnov
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: májno
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: májnnobihtit
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: májnnu
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: májnnuv
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: májnnu
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: májnoj
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: májnojma 
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: májnojda
    májnnot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: májnojga
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: májno
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: májnnus
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: májnnon 
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: májnno
    májnnot+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: májnnuska
    májnnot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: májnnup
    májnnot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: májnnut
    májnnot+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: májnnusa
    májnnot+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: májnotjav
    májnnot+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: májnotja
    májnnot+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: májnosj
    májnnot+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: májnotji
    májnnot+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: májnoduváj
    májnnot+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: májnudaláj
    májnnot+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: májnolulu
    májnnot+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: májnolulujma

Verb - bávkkot: # BÅRSSJOT_IV
    bávkkot+V+IV+Inf: bávkkot 
    bávkkot+V+IV+Sup: [bávkotjit, bávkutjit]
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ger: bávkodijn
    bávkkot+V+IV+PrfPrc: bávkkum
    bávkkot+V+IV+PrsPrc: bávkko
    bávkkot+V+IV+Actio+Ess: bávkkomin
    bávkkot+V+IV+Actio+Ela: bávkkomis
    bávkkot+V+IV+VAbess: bávkok
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bávkov
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bávko
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: bávkkobihtit
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bávkku
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bávkkuv
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: bávkku
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bávkoj
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: bávkojma 
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: bávkojda
    bávkkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bávkojga
    bávkkot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: bávko
    bávkkot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: bávkkus
    bávkkot+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: bávkkon 
    bávkkot+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: bávkko
    bávkkot+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: bávkkuska
    bávkkot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: bávkkup
    bávkkot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: bávkkut
    bávkkot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: bávkkusa
    bávkkot+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: bavkotjav
    bávkkot+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: bávkotja
    bávkkot+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: bávkosj
    bávkkot+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: bávkotji
    bávkkot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bávkoduváj
    bávkkot+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: bávkolulu
    bávkkot+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: bávkolulujma
    
Verb - rævggot: # VILSSJOT_IV
    rævggot+V+IV+Inf: rævggot 
    rævggot+V+IV+Sup: [rævgotjit, revgutjit]
    rævggot+V+IV+Ger: rævgodijn
    rævggot+V+IV+PrfPrc: rævggum
    rævggot+V+IV+PrsPrc: rævggo
    rævggot+V+IV+Actio+Ess: rævggomin
    rævggot+V+IV+Actio+Ela: rævggomis
    rævggot+V+IV+VAbess: rævgok
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rævgov
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rævgo
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rævggobihtit
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rævggu
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rævgguv
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rævggu
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rævgoj
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: rævgojma 
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: rævgojda
    rævggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: rævgojga
    rævggot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: rævgo
    rævggot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: rævggus
    rævggot+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: rævggon 
    rævggot+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: rævggo
    rævggot+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: rævgguska
    rævggot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: rævggup
    rævggot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: rævggut
    rævggot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: rævggusa
    rævggot+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: rævgotjav
    rævggot+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: rævgotja
    rævggot+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: rævgosj
    rævggot+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: rævgotji
    rævggot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rævgoduváj
    rævggot+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: rævgolulu
    rævggot+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: rævgolulujma
